test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-immeel_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - immeel: # 1B g-v, CCVV > CV
    immeel+N+Sg+Nom: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Gen: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Acc: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Ill: iṃelân
    immeel+N+Sg+Loc: iṃelist
    immeel+N+Sg+Com: iṃeláin
    immeel+N+Sg+Abe: immeelttáá
    immeel+N+Ess: iṃelin
    immeel+N+Par: iṃelid
    immeel+N+Pl+Nom: iṃeleh
    immeel+N+Pl+Gen: iṃelij
    immeel+N+Pl+Acc: iṃelijd
    immeel+N+Pl+Ill: iṃeláid
    immeel+N+Pl+Loc: iṃelijn
    immeel+N+Pl+Com: iṃelijguin
    immeel+N+Pl+Abe: iṃelijttáá
